Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Human Services by section 1  (4), chapter 668, Oregon Laws 2019,
for the biennium ending June 30, 2021, for aging and people  with disabilities and
intellectual/developmental disabilities programs, is decreased by $68,448,535.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Human Services by section 1  (3), chapter 668, Oregon Laws 2019,
for the biennium ending June 30, 2021, for child welfare, is decreased by $1,855,725.
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Human Services by section 1  (1), chapter 668, Oregon Laws 2019,
for the biennium ending June 30, 2021, for central services and state  assessments and
enterprise-wide costs, is increased by $70,304,260  for food and shelter services related to
wildfire recovery.
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on  ex-
penditures established by section 2 (1), chapter 668, Oregon Laws 2019, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and Medicare receipts  and including federal
funds for indirect cost recovery,  Social Security Supplemental Security Income recoveries
and the Child Care and Development Fund,  but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not
described in section 2, chapter 668, Oregon Laws 2019, collected or received by  the Depart-
ment of Human Services, for central services and state assessments and  enterprise-wide
costs, is increased by $68,687,837 to allow the  agency to use federal reimbursement funds for
wildfire-related food and shelter costs.
SECTION 5. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on  ex-
penditures established by section 3 (3), chapter 668, Oregon Laws 2019, for  the biennium
ending June 30,  2021, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section  2, chapter 668, Oregon Laws 2019, collected or
received by the Department of Human Services, for child welfare, is increased by $1,855,725.
SECTION 6. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on  ex-
penditures established by section 3 (4), chapter 668, Oregon Laws 2019, for  the biennium
ending June 30,  2021, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section  2, chapter 668, Oregon Laws 2019, collected or
Enrolled House Bill 5042 (HB 5042-A) Page 1
received by the Department of Human  Services, for aging and people with disabilities and
intellectual/developmental disabilities programs, is increased by $74,162,847.
SECTION 7. Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Health Authority by section 1  (1), chapter 695, Oregon Laws 2019, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2021,  for Health Systems, Health Policy and Analytics, and
Public Health, is increased  by $4,058,368 to rebalance the agency’s budget, repay federal
Medicaid matching funds owed to the federal government, begin implementation of the
Oregon Psilocybin Services Act and fund behavioral health investments  related to ORS
161.370.
NOTE:
 Section 8 was deleted. Subsequent sections were not renumbered.
SECTION 9. Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Health Authority by section  1 (3), chapter 695, Oregon Laws 2019, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2021, for central services, state assessments  and enterprise-
wide costs, is increased by $1,844,075 to rebalance the agency’s budget.
SECTION 10. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon  Health Authority by section 7, chapter 560, Oregon Laws 2019, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2021, is decreased by $84,473 as  part of a net-zero technical ad-
justment with the General Fund appropriation made to the Oregon Health Authority by
section 1 (1), chapter 695, Oregon Laws 2019, for Health  Systems, Health Policy and Analyt-
ics, and Public Health.
SECTION 11.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Health  Authority by section 11, chapter 629, Oregon Laws 2019, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2021, is decreased by $591,974  as part of a net-zero technical ad-
justment with the General Fund appropriation made to the Oregon Health Authority by
section 1 (1), chapter 695, Oregon Laws 2019, for Health  Systems, Health Policy and Analyt-
ics, and Public Health.
SECTION 12.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 2 (1), chapter 695, Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including  Miscellaneous Receipts, tobacco tax receipts, recreational
marijuana tax receipts, provider taxes, Medicare receipts and federal funds  for indirect cost
recovery, Supplemental Security Income recoveries,  Women, Infants and Children Program
food rebates, the Coordinated School Health Program, the  Edward Byrne Memorial State and
Local Law Enforcement Assistance Grant Program and emergency preparedness and re-
sponse services, but excluding lottery funds and  federal funds not described in section 2,
chapter 695, Oregon Laws 2019, collected or received  by the Oregon Health Authority, for
Health Systems, Health Policy and Analytics, and Public  Health, is increased by $615,420,291
to rebalance the agency’s budget and begin implementation of the Drug Addiction  Treatment
and Recovery Act.
NOTE:
 Section 13 was deleted. Subsequent sections were not renumbered.
SECTION 14. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 2 (3), chapter 695, Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including  Miscellaneous Receipts, tobacco tax receipts, recreational
marijuana tax receipts, provider taxes, Medicare receipts and federal funds  for indirect cost
recovery, Supplemental Security Income recoveries,  Women, Infants and Children Program
food rebates, the Coordinated School Health Program, the  Edward Byrne Memorial State and
Local Law Enforcement Assistance Grant Program and emergency preparedness and re-
sponse services, but excluding lottery funds and  federal funds not described in section 2,
chapter 695, Oregon Laws 2019, collected or received  by the Oregon Health Authority, for
central services, state assessments  and enterprise-wide costs, is increased by $29,293 to re-
balance the agency’s budget.
Enrolled House Bill 5042 (HB 5042-A) Page 2
SECTION 15. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 4 (1), chapter 695, Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from  federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section 2, chapter 695,  Oregon Laws 2019, collected or
received by the Oregon Health Authority, for Health  Systems, Health Policy and Analytics,
and Public Health, is decreased by $129,961,710 as a result of  net adjustments to rebalance
the agency’s budget and fund behavioral health investments related to ORS 161.370.
NOTE: Section 16 was deleted. Subsequent sections were not renumbered.
SECTION 17. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 4 (3), chapter 695, Oregon Laws 2019, for  the biennium
ending June 30,  2021, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section  2, chapter 695, Oregon Laws 2019, collected or
received by the Oregon Health Authority, for central services, state assessments and
enterprise-wide costs, is increased by $5,306,299 to rebalance the agency’s budget.
SECTION 18.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Justice by  section 1, chapter 608, Oregon Laws 2019, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2021, for the payment of expenses of district attorneys, is increased
by $575,000 for reconciliation of personal services expenses.
SECTION 19. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the  Public Defense Services Commission by section 1 (2), chapter 303, Oregon Laws
2019, for the biennium ending June 30, 2021, for professional services, is decreased by $133,715
for a technical adjustment.
SECTION 20. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Public Defense Services Commission by section 1 (3), chapter 303,  Oregon Laws
2019, for the  biennium ending June 30, 2021, for the Contract and Business Services Division,
is increased by $133,715 for a technical adjustment.
SECTION 21. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 4, chapter 269, Oregon Laws 2019,  for the biennium ending
June 30,  2021, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds other than
those described in section 2, chapter 269, Oregon Laws 2019,  collected or received by the
Employment Department, is decreased by $30,000,000.
SECTION 22. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 1 (1), chapter 269, Oregon Laws 2019, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and moneys appropriated to the  Employ-
ment Department by sections 2 and 3, chapter 269, Oregon Laws 2019,  but excluding lottery
funds and federal funds other than those described in section 2, chapter  269, Oregon Laws
2019, collected or received by the Employment  Department, for unemployment insurance,
shared services and workforce operations, and workforce and  economic research, is in-
creased by $30,000,000 for payment of administrative expenses related to unemployment in-
surance.
SECTION 23.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 4,  chapter 642, Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium ending
June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds other  than
those described in sections 2 and 6, chapter 642, Oregon Laws 2019,  collected or received by
the Housing and Community Services Department, is increased by $526,951 to  administer
federal funding for rental assistance, energy assistance, homeless assistance and coronavirus
relief programs.
SECTION 24. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 1 (1), chapter 694, Oregon Laws 2019, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and  federal
Enrolled House Bill 5042 (HB 5042-A) Page 3
funds, collected or received by the Oregon Liquor  Control Commission, for administrative
expenses, is increased by $1,531,400 for payment of bank card fees.
SECTION 25. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 1 (4), chapter 694, Oregon Laws 2019, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and  federal
funds, collected or received by the Oregon Liquor Control Commission, for agents’  compen-
sation - all other, is increased by $2,255,296 for retail store liquor agent compensation.
SECTION 26. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 1 (5), chapter 694, Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal
funds, collected or received by the Oregon Liquor Control Commission, for agents’ compen-
sation - distillery agents, is increased by $659,000 for distillery agents’ compensation.
SECTION 27. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$629,574 is established for the biennium ending  June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses from fees, moneys, or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
but excluding lottery funds and federal  funds, collected or received by the Real Estate
Agency for increased testing costs.
SECTION 28. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 4 (1), chapter 452, Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds other
than those described in section 2, chapter  452, Oregon Laws 2019, collected or received by the
State Department of  Agriculture, for administrative and support services, is increased by
$32,630 to shift limitation between program areas.
SECTION 29.
Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 4 (4), chapter 452, Oregon Laws 2019, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds other
than those described in section 2, chapter  452, Oregon Laws 2019, collected or received by the
State Department of Agriculture, for market access, is decreased by $32,630 to shift limita-
tion between program areas.
SECTION 30.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the State Department of Energy by section 1,  chapter 698, Oregon Laws 2019, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2021, for  debt service for the small scale local energy loan
program, is decreased by $4,334,048.
SECTION 31. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Legislative Assembly by  section 6, chapter 693, Oregon Laws 2019, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2021, for payment of the expenses  of certain offices, is decreased
by $1,500,000.
SECTION 32. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Legislative Assembly by  section 7 (1), chapter 693, Oregon Laws 2019, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2021, for payment of the expenses of members of the  Eightieth
Legislative Assembly of the State of Oregon, is increased by $100,000.
SECTION 33. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Legislative Assembly by  section 7 (2), chapter 693, Oregon Laws 2019, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2021,  for payment of the expenses of members of the Eighty-first
Legislative Assembly of the State of Oregon, is increased by $1,400,000.
SECTION 34. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Corrections by section  1 (1), chapter 688, Oregon Laws 2019, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2021, for operations and health services,  is decreased by
$5,747,811.
Enrolled House Bill 5042 (HB 5042-A) Page 4
SECTION 35. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Corrections by section  1 (2), chapter 688, Oregon Laws 2019, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2021, for central administration and administrative services,
is increased by $10,593,586.
SECTION 36. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Corrections by section 1  (3), chapter 688, Oregon Laws 2019, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2021, for offender management  and rehabilitation, is decreased
by $2,218,948.
SECTION 37. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Corrections by section  1 (6), chapter 688, Oregon Laws 2019, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2021, for capital improvements, is decreased by $2,626,827.
SECTION 38. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (1), chapter 688, Oregon Laws 2019, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and  federal
funds, collected or received by the Department of Corrections, for operations and  health
services, is increased by $19,500,000 for federal reimbursement of COVID-19 expenses.
SECTION 39. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 2 (1), chapter 688, Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal
funds, collected  or received by the Department of Corrections, for operations and health
services, is increased by $1,500,000 for federal reimbursement of expenses incurred during the
2020 wildfire season.
SECTION 40.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Justice by section 1 (5), chapter 692, Oregon Laws 2019, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2021, for the defense  of criminal convictions, is increased by
$550,000 for forecasted caseload expenses.
SECTION 41.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Military Department by section 1 (4), chapter 534, Oregon  Laws 2019, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2021, for community support, is increased  by $229,608 for state
active duty expenses and to provide matching funds for reimbursable wildfire expenses.
SECTION 42. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Military Department by section 1 (1), chapter 534, Oregon  Laws 2019, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2021, for  administration, is increased by $25,000 for interest
expenses.
SECTION 43. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 2 (4), chapter 534, Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and  reimbursements from federal service
agreements, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter
534, Oregon Laws 2019, collected or received by  the Oregon Military Department, for com-
munity support, is increased by  $3,376,526 for federal reimbursement of expenses incurred
during the 2020 wildfire season.
SECTION 44.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Military Department by section 1 (3), chapter 534, Oregon  Laws 2019, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2021, for emergency management, is increased by $584,456  to
provide state matching funds for the Federal Emergency Management Agency’s Other Needs
Assistance  program.
SECTION 45.
Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (1), chapter 479, Oregon Laws 2019, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
Enrolled House Bill 5042 (HB 5042-A) Page 5
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and  federal
funds, collected or received by the Department  of Public Safety Standards and Training, for
operations, is increased by $1,503,520 to add three classes to the 2019-2021 training calendar.
SECTION 46. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the  Public Defense Services Commission by section 1 (1), chapter 303, Oregon Laws
2019, for the biennium  ending June 30, 2021, for the Appellate Division, is increased by
$1,000,000 for the payment of transcription and discovery services.
SECTION 47. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the  Public Defense Services Commission by section 1 (2), chapter 303, Oregon Laws
2019, for the biennium ending June 30, 2021, for professional services, is increased by
$6,185,368 for increases in contracting costs and the Parent Child Representation Program.
SECTION 48.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the  Public Defense Services Commission by section 1 (3), chapter 303, Oregon Laws
2019, for the  biennium ending June 30, 2021, for the Contract and Business Services Division,
is increased by $353,854 for office equipment for the Multnomah County Courthouse.
SECTION 49. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the limitation on expenditures
established by section 71, chapter 9, Oregon  Laws 2020 (second special session), for the
biennium ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit for  payment of expenses from federal
funds collected or  received by the Department of Veterans’ Affairs, is increased by $849,918
for CARES Act Provider Relief Fund payments to the Oregon Veterans’ Homes.
SECTION 50. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the limitation on expenditures
established by section 4, chapter 570, Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium ending  June 30,
2021, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds collected or received
by the Department of Veterans’ Affairs, is increased  by $110,164 for the State Approving
Agency program.
SECTION 51.
Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2, chapter 669, Oregon Laws 2019,  for the biennium ending
June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from fees,  moneys or other
revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds,
collected or received by the Department of Land Conservation and  Development, is increased
by $150,901 for collaborative projects funding.
SECTION 52.
Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by the Emergency Board at its November 9, 2020, meeting  (Item No.
3), for the biennium ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from moneys received by the Oregon Department of Administrative Services  from the Fed-
eral Emergency Management Agency to pay for  COVID-19 emergency response activities, is
increased by $54,465,305 for FEMA reimbursement  of protective equipment purchases and
2020 fire season costs.
SECTION 53.
Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by the Emergency Board at its  January 8, 2021, meeting (Item No. 16),
for the biennium ending June 30, 2021, as the  maximum limit for payment of expenses for
reimbursement of costs  incurred in responding to the COVID-19 pandemic from revenues
received from the Coronavirus Relief Fund  by the Oregon Department of Administrative
Services, is increased by $8,923,765 for agency-related COVID-19 expenses.
SECTION 54. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Revenue by section 1 (5), chapter 612,  Oregon Laws 2019, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2021, for the Corporate Division, is  decreased by $108,398 for a
technical adjustment.
SECTION 55. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 2 (6), chapter 612, Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and  reimbursements from federal service
Enrolled House Bill 5042 (HB 5042-A) Page 6
agreements, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter
612, Oregon Laws 2019, collected or received by the Department of  Revenue, for the Corpo-
rate Division, is increased by $108,398 for a technical adjustment.
SECTION 56.
Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 323 (1),  chapter 9, Oregon Laws 2020 (second special ses-
sion), for the biennium ending June 30, 2021, as the  maximum limit for payment of
grants-in-aid, program costs and purchased services from federal funds, other than those
described in sections 8 and 10, chapter 609, Oregon Laws 2019, collected or received by  the
Department of Education, for K-12 programs, is increased  by $4,109,313 for assistance from
funds received through the federal  Governor’s Emergency Education Relief Fund to address
the impacts that COVID-19 has had and will have on  eligible nonpublic school students and
teachers through grants, contracts and other assistance.
SECTION 57.
Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 8 (1), chapter 609, Oregon Laws 2019, for  the biennium
ending June 30,  2021, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds,
other than those described in sections 9 and 10, chapter 609, Oregon  Laws 2019, collected or
received by the  Department of Education, for operations, is increased by $117,872 for the
administration and oversight of the funding for  eligible non-public school students and
teachers funded through the federal Governor’s Emergency Education Relief Fund.
SECTION 58. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 323 (2),  chapter 9, Oregon Laws 2020 (second special ses-
sion), for the biennium ending June 30, 2021, as the  maximum limit for payment of
grants-in-aid, program costs and purchased services from federal funds, other than those
described in sections 8 and 10, chapter 609, Oregon Laws 2019, received  by the Department
of Education, for early learning programs, is  increased by $22,000,000 for assistance to child
care providers.
SECTION 59.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Higher Education Coordinating Commission by  section 1 (1), chapter 666, Oregon
Laws 2019, for the biennium ending June 30, 2021, for Higher Education  Coordinating Com-
mission operations, is increased by  $4,980,000 for funding of positions and other costs for the
operations of the agency.
SECTION 60. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Higher Education Coordinating Commission by  section 1 (3), chapter 666, Oregon
Laws 2019, for the  biennium ending June 30, 2021, for the Community College Support Fund
for distribution to community colleges and community college  service districts, is increased
by $542,033 for payment to  Blue Mountain Community College for education services to
adults in custody in Department of Corrections facilities.
SECTION 61. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 4 (2), chapter 522, Oregon Laws 2019, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from  federal funds
collected or received by the Oregon Business Development Department,  for infrastructure,
is increased by  $7,923,907 for the expenditure of Community Development Block Grant fund-
ing for emergency rental assistance and micro-enterprise assistance.
SECTION 62. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 2 (1), chapter 522, Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal
funds, collected or received by the  Oregon Business Development Department, for business,
innovation and trade, is increased by $1,500,000 for funding from  the Coronavirus Relief Fund
received by  the Oregon Department of Administrative Services and transferred to the
Oregon Business Development Department for agency costs related to the COVID-19
pandemic.
Enrolled House Bill 5042 (HB 5042-A) Page 7
SECTION 63. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 4 (1), chapter 522, Oregon Laws 2019, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from  federal funds
collected or received by the Oregon Business Development Department, for business, inno-
vation and trade, is  increased by $439,040 for the creation of an economic recovery plan and
business adaptation strategies to assist Oregon businesses disrupted by COVID-19.
SECTION 64.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the expenditure limi-
tation established by the Emergency Board at its June 5, 2020, meeting (Item No.  11), for the
biennium ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit for  payment of expenses by the Oregon
Business Development Department from funding from the  Coronavirus Relief Fund received
by the Oregon Department of Administrative Services and transferred to  the Oregon Busi-
ness Development Department, for business, innovation and trade,  for a grant program for
stabilizing rural Type A and Type B Hospital operations, is decreased by $15,200,000.
SECTION 65. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the expenditure limi-
tation established by the Emergency Board at its June 5, 2020, meeting (Item No.  12), for the
biennium ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit for  payment of expenses by the Oregon
Business Development Department from funding  from the Coronavirus Relief Fund received
by the Oregon Department  of Administrative Services and transferred to the Oregon Busi-
ness Development Department, for business, innovation  and trade, to provide personal pro-
tective equipment for small businesses, is increased by $4,000,000.
SECTION 66. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$9,200,000 is established for the biennium ending June 30, 2021, as  the maximum limit for
payment of expenses by the  Oregon Business Development Department from funding from
the Coronavirus Relief Fund received by the  Oregon Department of Administrative Services
and transferred to the Oregon Business Development Department, for  a commercial rent
relief program.
SECTION 67. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the expenditure limi-
tation established by the Emergency Board at its June 5, 2020, meeting (Item No.  10), for the
biennium ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit for  payment of expenses by the Oregon
Business Development Department from funding  from the Coronavirus Relief Fund received
by the Oregon Department  of Administrative Services and transferred to the Oregon Busi-
ness Development Department,  for business, innovation and trade, for technical assistance
to minority- and woman-owned businesses affected by the COVID-19 pandemic,  is increased
by $2,000,000.
SECTION 68. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the expenditure limi-
tation established by the Emergency Board at  its July 14, 2020, meeting (Item No. 4), for the
biennium ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit for  payment of expenses by the De-
partment of Consumer  and Business Services from funding from the Coronavirus Relief Fund
received by the Oregon  Department of Administrative Services and transferred to the De-
partment of  Consumer and Business Services, to establish a Quarantine Time Loss program,
is increased by $5,000,000.
SECTION 69. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (2), chapter 664, Oregon Laws 2019, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and including federal funds from the United
States Forest Service for fire protection and for research projects, but excluding  lottery
funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter  664, Oregon Laws 2019, collected
or received by the State Forestry  Department, for fire protection, is increased by $14,193,563
for the processing of payments associated with emergency firefighting costs  of the 2016
through 2019 forest fire seasons.
SECTION 70. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 1 (3), chapter 454, Oregon Laws 2019, for  the biennium
Enrolled House Bill 5042 (HB 5042-A) Page 8
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds, federal  funds
and funds described in section 2, chapter  454, Oregon Laws 2019, collected or received by the
Department of State Lands,  for South Slough National Estuarine Research Reserve oper-
ations, is increased by $200,000.
SECTION 71. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 3 (1), chapter 454, Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
ending June 30,  2021, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds
collected or received by the Department of State Lands, for  South Slough National Estuarine
Research Reserve operations, is decreased by $200,000.
SECTION 72. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2, chapter 521, Oregon Laws 2019,  for the biennium ending
June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from fees,  moneys or other
revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, and including federal Older Americans Act  funds
received from the Department of Human Services, but excluding lottery funds and federal
funds not described in section 2, chapter 521, Oregon Laws 2019,  collected or received by the
Long Term Care Ombudsman, is  increased by $6,000 to allow the agency to use donations
received in support of the Oregon Public Guardian and Conservator program.
SECTION 73.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 3 (2), chapter 534, Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from  federal funds,
other than those described in section  2, chapter 534, Oregon Laws 2019, collected or received
by the Oregon  Military Department, for emergency management, is increased by $605,300,000
for receipt and distribution of funds from the Federal Emergency Management Agency.
SECTION 74. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the  Department of State Police by section 1 (1), chapter 568, Oregon Laws 2019, for
the biennium ending June 30,  2021, for patrol services, criminal investigations, gaming
enforcement and office of the State Fire Marshal, is increased by  $1,500,000 for the Wildland
Urban Interface Assistance grant program.
SECTION 75. In addition to and not in lieu of any  other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the State Forestry Department, for the biennium ending June 30, 2021, out  of the
General Fund, the amount of $1,500,000 for a county communications infrastructure grant
program.
SECTION 76.
In addition to and  not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Department of Administrative Services, for the biennium ending  June
30, 2021, out of the  General Fund, the following amounts, for grants to mitigate impacts from
the 2020 wildfires:
(1) City of Gates ............................. $ 98,495
(2) Jackson County Housing
Authority .................................. $ 200,000
(3) City of Talent ............................ $ 210,000
(4) City of Estacada ........................ $ 220,000
(5) City of Phoenix ......................... $ 250,000
(6) City of Detroit .......................... $ 272,329
(7) Idanha-Detroit Rural Fire
Protection District .................... $ 350,000
(8) Marion County .......................... $ 426,957
(9) Douglas County ......................... $ 450,000
(10) Lane County.............................. $ 451,000
(11) Lincoln County.......................... $ 725,000
Enrolled House Bill 5042 (HB 5042-A) Page 9
SECTION 77. In addition to and not in lieu of any  other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Department of Administrative Services, for the biennium ending  June
30, 2021, out of the General Fund, the following amounts for the following purposes:
(1) City of McMinnville for a
navigation center ...................... $ 1,500,000
(2) City of Roseburg for a
navigation center ...................... $ 1,500,000
(3) City of Bend for a
navigation center ...................... $ 2,500,000
(4) Helping Hands Reentry
Outreach Centers DBA Bybee
Lakes Hope Center for a
navigation center ...................... $ 2,000,000
(5) City of Medford for a
navigation center ...................... $ 2,500,000
(6) City of Salem for a
navigation center ...................... $ 5,000,000
(7) Lane County for a navigation
center within the City of
Eugene ...................................... $ 5,000,000
SECTION 78.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Emergency Board by section 1, chapter 644, Oregon Laws 2019, for the  biennium
ending June 30, 2021, for the purposes for which the Emergency  Board lawfully may allocate
funds, is decreased by $13,843,571.
SECTION 79. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Emergency Board by section 122 (1), chapter 644, Oregon Laws  2019, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2021, for allocation to the Secretary of State for costs relating to
chapter 638, Oregon Laws 2019, is decreased by $1,146,094.
SECTION 80.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the  Emergency Board by section 5 (1)(b), chapter 664, Oregon Laws 2019, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2021, for  allocation to the State Forestry Department for cat-
astrophic wildfire insurance premium expenses, is decreased by $2,000,000.
SECTION 81. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Emergency Board by section 1, chapter 2, Oregon Laws  2020 (third special ses-
sion), for the biennium ending June 30, 2021, for the purposes for  which the Emergency
Board lawfully may allocate funds, is decreased by $74,615,000.
SECTION 82. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Emergency Board by section 2, chapter 2, Oregon Laws  2020 (third special ses-
sion), for the biennium ending June  30, 2021, for allocation for the state’s response to the
COVID-19 pandemic public health emergency, is decreased by $208,867,888.
SECTION 83. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Emergency Board by section 3, chapter 2, Oregon Laws  2020 (third special ses-
sion), for allocation for the state’s wildfire recovery, prevention and preparedness  activities,
is decreased by $7,072,256.
SECTION 84. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Education by section 2 (4), chapter 609, Oregon  Laws 2019, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2021, for other K-12 grant-in-aid programs, is  increased by
$172,246 for the Supporting Accelerated Learning Opportunities program.
SECTION 85. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 2 (2), chapter 668, Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and Medicare receipts  and including federal
Enrolled House Bill 5042 (HB 5042-A) Page 10
funds for indirect cost recovery, Social Security  Supplemental Security Income recoveries
and the Child Care and Development Fund,  but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not
described in section 2, chapter 668, Oregon Laws of 2019, collected or  received by the De-
partment of Human Services,  for self-sufficiency and vocational rehabilitation services, is
increased by $2,000,000 to allow the agency to use funds transferred  to the agency by the
Department of Education for employment-related daycare services.
SECTION 86. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department  of Land Conservation and Development by section 1 (1), chapter 669,
Oregon Laws 2019, for the biennium ending  June 30, 2021, for the planning program, is in-
creased by $100,000 to assist wildfire-impacted communities with land use permitting.
SECTION 87. In addition to and  not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Department  of Education, for the biennium ending June 30, 2021, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $195,624,228 for deposit in the Summer Learning Program Ac-
count established by  section 19, chapter __, Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled Senate Bill 846), for
grants to school districts and education service districts for  summer learning programs,
enrichment programs and wrap-around child care.
SECTION 88. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$66,512,237 is established for the biennium ending  June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit for
payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received by  the Department of
Education, for grants to school districts and education service districts out of  the Summer
Learning Program Account established by section 19, chapter  __, Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled
Senate Bill 846), for  summer learning programs, enrichment programs and wrap-around child
care.
SECTION 89. In addition to and not in lieu of any  other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Department of Education, for the biennium ending June 30, 2021,  out of the
General Fund, the amount of $41,200,000 for a grant to the Oregon Community  Foundation
for summer enrichment programs for  students in kindergarten to grade 12 and to provide
parent-child summer programming for children up to age five.
SECTION 90. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 323 (2),  chapter 9, Oregon Laws 2020 (second special ses-
sion), for the biennium ending June 30, 2021, as the  maximum limit for payment of
grants-in-aid, program costs and purchased services from federal funds, other than those
described in sections 8 and 10, chapter 609, Oregon Laws 2019, received  by the Department
of Education, for early learning programs, is increased by $5,301,806 for child care and  early
learning programs.
SECTION 91.
In addition to and not in lieu of any  other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Department of Education, for the biennium ending June 30, 2021,  out of the
General Fund, the amount of $500,386 for the staffing and other administrative  costs of im-
plementing and administering the Summer Learning and Child Care program.
SECTION 92. In addition to and  not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Department  of Education, for the biennium ending June 30, 2021, out of the
General Fund, the  amount of $3,000,000 to continue early learning programs during the
summer months.
SECTION 93. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department  of Environmental Quality by section 1 (2), chapter 663, Oregon Laws
2019, for the biennium ending June 30, 2021, for water quality, is increased  by $94,335 for
staffing and equipment related to testing for cyanotoxins caused by harmful algal blooms.
SECTION 94. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Human Services by section 1  (2), chapter 668, Oregon Laws 2019,
for the biennium ending June 30, 2021, for self-sufficiency and vocational  rehabilitation ser-
Enrolled House Bill 5042 (HB 5042-A) Page 11
vices, is increased by $2,900,000 for distribution to the Oregon Food Bank  for emergency food
purchases.
SECTION 95. This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation  of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2021 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by House April 1, 2021
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate April 8, 2021
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5042 (HB 5042-A) Page 12